src/morphology/affixes/adjectives-L2.lexc
LEXICON EAMOS !!= * __@CODE@__
! The 3 next lines are for MALIS0
! minus the pointer to Ess Px.
 +Sg+Nom:%>X4 K ;
 +Ess:%>X4in K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2 PxC ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X2a K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X2 K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2 PxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X2a K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X2 K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2 PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>X2at K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2asa%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2ijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>X2ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>X2is K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X2in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:%>X2ijn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%>X2ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>X2ijd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>X2ijd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>X2ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>X2ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>X2ijn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X2ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X2ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:%>X2ijgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>X2ij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2istti%> PxV ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2ijnni%> PxV ;
! +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X2ijddi%> PxV ; !^P^ !MARG
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2ijddás%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2ijnni%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 :%>X2 ADVC ;
 +Attr:%>X4 K ; ! Attributive superaltives
              ! Here and not in MALIS0 because
              ! also nouns go there.



LEXICON GAPPUS0 !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
! +Cmp/SgNom+Use/-Spell+Err/Orth@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@:X7@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;  L2
! +Cmp/SgNom+Use/-Spell+Err/Orth@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@:@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;  L2
 +Cmp/SgNom: R ;
!+Use/-Spell: VUOHTA ;		 L2	! (callers have added +A already)
 +Ess:in K ;

!! Almost id. to MALIS0.
!! MALIS0 has no VUOHTA,
!! GAPPUS0 has no Px Ess., and
!! shouldn't have either.

LEXICON GAPPUS- !!= * __@CODE@__ !!= * __@CODE@__
 MALLAS- ; ! should be flipped with the rest.

!! GOAL: Keep GAPPUS- and MALLAS- apart, because of
!! the Px(1)V issue, but unify the rest.
!! GAPPUS- and MALLAS- differ
!! in the A and N treatment of
!! Pl Nom Px (only 1st p. for A
!! and all persons for N).
!! Now that MALLASI- is deleted,
!! GAPPUS- and MALLAS- are
!! identical. We check by pointing
!! GAPPUS- to MALLAS-. Look into this.
!! and remove GAPPUS- for MALLAS-
!! eventually.

LEXICON MEAHTTUN   !!= * __@CODE@__ Deverbal adjectives.
 +A:n%> ATTR ;
 +A+Attr+Err/Orth:m%>is%> ATTR ;
 +A:s%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:m%> GAPPUS0 ;   ! NE and vuohta
 +A+Sg+Gen:m%>a K ; ! Stem vowel -a-, no short genitive
 +A+Sg+Gen:m%>a R ; ! Stem vowel -a-, no short genitive
 +A+Sg+Acc:m%>a K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom:m%>at K ;
 +A:m%>i MALLASI-/NUORABU- ;  ! obl
 +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:m%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:m%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:m%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:m%>asa%> PxV ;
 +A+Sg+Gen:m%> K ;
 +A+Sg+Acc:m%> K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:m%>iiddá%> Px1V ;

LEXICON LEXATTR_GEAHTES !!= * __@CODE@__
:keahtes LEXATTR ;
:geahtes LEXATTR ;

LEXICON GEAHTES !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Der4+Der/geahtes+A+Attr:»#geahtes K ;
 +Der4+Der/geahtes+A+Attr:»#keahtes K ;

LEXICON OVDDIT  !!= * __@CODE@__ Inherently comparative adjectives
 +A+Comp+Attr:%>b K ;
 +A+Comp:%>b BUStem ;
 +A+Superl:%>muss BUOREMUS ;

LEXICON MADDELEABBO  !!= * __@CODE@__ Inherently comparative adjectives
 +A+Comp+Attr:%> K ;
 +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;







!! !!!Nominal derivation
! ------------------

!! !!Noun derivation
! - - - - - - - -


LEXICON VUOHTA  !!= * __@CODE@__ +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/DefPlGen
 +CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+Der3+Der/vuohta+N:»»»#vuoh'ta@C.NeedNoun@ VUOHTAMORPH ;


LEXICON VUOHTAMORPH !!= * __@CODE@__
! NomV ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:%> R ;
! +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»viđá K ;  L2
! +Der/viđi+Adv:»viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
 :%> GOAHTE- ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:%>X4 R ;



LEXICON DenominalNounsV !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:»X6ž DIMINC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:»X6žažž JOHTOLAT0 ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:»X6žažža%> JOHTOLAHKA- ;
! +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:»X6ž DIMINC ;
! This is what I want, do this at some point!
! +Der/laš+N:»lažž MUSH ;
! this one was removed bec. of +Der/laš+A in the DenominalAdjsV
! lexicon. But was there any good reason for the laš -> MUSH
! pointer in the first place?

LEXICON DenominalNounsC !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:»ažž DIMINV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:»ačča»ž MALIS0 ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:»ačča»ž MALLAS- ;



LEXICON EAPMI !!= * __@CODE@__
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Nom:eapmi%> K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:eapme%> K ;
! +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Nom:eapmi%> Px3V ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Cmp/SgNom:%>an R ;
! +N+Sem/Act+Cmp/SgNom+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»anviđá K ;  L2
! +N+Sem/Act+Cmp/SgNom+Der/viđi+Adv:»anviđi K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:%>an VEARA ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Ess:eapmi%>n K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Ess:eapmi%>n%> PxC ;
! +N+Sem/Act+Ess:eame%>n K ;  !Actio Ess
! +N+Sem/Act+Ess:eame%> K ; !Actio Ess
 +Sem/Act+N:eapmi%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sem/Act+N:eapmi%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Sem/Act+Err/Orth:eapmi%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Gen:eapmi%>X4 K ;   
 +N+Sem/Act+Cmp/SgGen:eapmi%>X4 R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Acc:eapmi%>X4 K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Gen:eapmi%>X4 Px3V ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Acc:eapmi%>X4 Px3V ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc:eapmi%>X4s K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc:eapme%>X4s K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:eapmi%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc:eapmi%>X4st%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:eapmi%>X4t K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:eapmi%>X5jn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Com:eapmi%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:eapmi%>X5jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Com:eapmi%>%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:eapmi%>X5jd%> Px1C ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:eapmi%>%^DISIMPjd%> Px1C ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:eapmi%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:eapmi%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:eapmi%>X5jd R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Cmp/PlGen:eapmi%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:eapmi%>X5jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:eapmi%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:eapmi%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:eapmi%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:eapmi%>X5jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:eapmi%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:eapmi%>X5jde K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:eapmi%>%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:eapmi%>X5jdasa%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:eapmi%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:eapmi%>X5jn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:eapmi%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:eapmi%>X5js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:eapmi%>%^DISIMPjs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:eapmi%>X5jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:eapmi%>%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:eapmi%>X5jgujn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com:eapmi%>%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Orth:eapmi%>X5j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com/Sh:eapmi%>%^DISIMPj%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:eapmi%>X5jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com:eapmi%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxPlComC ;
 +Sem/Act+N:eapmi%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Gen+Allegro+Use/NG:eapmi%>X8 K ; ! Ditto (?) 
