src/morphology/stems/adjectives-L2.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
alleleabbo:allel MADDELEABBO ;
bajit:baji OVDDIT ;
barggukeahtes+Use/LexSub:barggu LEXATTR_GEAHTES ; ! lexicalized noun
bealiválddekeahtes+Use/LexSub:beali#váldde LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
bealátkeahtes:bealát LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
biehtalkeahtes+Use/LexSub:biehtal LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
divatkeahtes:divat LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
jođaskeahtes:jođas LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
boatkkakeahtes+Use/LexSub:boatkka LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
boađuskeahtes+Use/LexSub:boađus LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
duohpakeahtes+Use/LexSub:duohpa LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
dássedeattokeahtes+Use/LexSub:dásse#deatto LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
dássedeattukeahtes+Use/LexSub:dásse#deattu LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
gahperkeahtes:gahper LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
gilvvekeahtes+Err/Sub:gilvva LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
gilvvekeahtes:gilvve LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
gáržžekeahtes+Use/LexSub:gáržže LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
hearrákeahtes+Use/LexSub:hearrá LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
historjjákeahtes+Use/LexSub:historjjá LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
huksenkeahtes:huksen LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
isitkeahtes:isit LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
jeagelkeahtes:jeagel LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
ruohtaskeahtes:ruohtas LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
juogakeahtes+Use/LexSub:juoga LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
láhkačálakeahtes+Use/LexSub:láhka#čála LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
maŋit:maŋi OVDDIT ;
mohtorkeahtes:mohtor LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
muhtehahtekeahtes+Use/LexSub:muhtehahte LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
máddeleabbo:máddel MADDELEABBO ;
namakeahtes+Use/LexSub:nama LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
njoalokeahtes+Use/LexSub:njoalo LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
náitalkeahtes+Use/LexSub:náital LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
oassemávssekeahtes+Use/LexSub:oasse#mávsse LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
olggut:olggu OVDDIT ;
ovddit:ovddi OVDDIT ;
ovddet:ovdde OVDDIT ;
ođasnuvakeahtes+Use/LexSub:ođasnuva LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
rievssatkeahtes:rievssat LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
vealatkeahtes:vealat LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
rájákeahtes+Use/LexSub:rájá LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
siskkit:siskki OVDDIT ;
sivakeahtes+Use/LexSub:siva LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
sojankeahtes+Use/LexSub:sojan LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
sorjjaskeahtes+Err/Sub:sorjan LEXATTR_GEAHTES; !
sorjjaskeahtes+Err/Sub:sorjja LEXATTR_GEAHTES; !?
sorjjaskeahtes:sorjjas LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
sánekeahtes+Use/LexSub:sáne LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
toffaseabbo+Use/LexSub:toffas MADDELEABBO ;
vearokeahtes+Use/LexSub:vearo LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
vuolit:vuoli OVDDIT ;
vuorukeahtes+Use/LexSub:vuoru LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
váhnenkeahtes:váhnen LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
áidonkeahtes:áidon LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
nagirkeahtes:nagir LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
áđat:áđa OVDDIT ;
áššeguoskekeahtes+Use/LexSub:ášše#guoske LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
čálakeahtes+Use/LexSub:čála LEXATTR_GEAHTES ; ! 11 in nač-corpus, 21 čálekeahtes
sohkarkeahtes:sohkar LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
glutenkeahtes:gluten LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
oassemávssekeahtes:oasse#mávsse LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
náitalkeahtes:náital LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
gánnáhahtekeahtes:gánnáhahte LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
árvvoštalakeahtes:árvvoštala LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
sávakeahtes:sáva LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
massekeahtes:masse LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
náitalkeahtes:náital LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
rievdatkeahtes:rievdat LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
čálitkeahtes:čálit LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
vástitkeahtes:vástit LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
vuorddekeahtes:vuordde LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
áidojuvvokeahtes:áidojuvvo LEXATTR_GEAHTES ;
